Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2,257.01
Food Code; adoption.

The Legislature hereby adopts by reference the Food Code as defined in section 81-2,244.01 as a part of the Nebraska Pure Food Act.

Laws 1997, LB 199, § 17.